District of Columbia statutes.
7-2507.04

False information; forgery or alteration.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any person purchasing any firearm or ammunition, or applying for any registration certificate or dealer’s license under this unit, or in giving any information pursuant to the requirements of this unit, to knowingly give false information or offer false evidence of identity.

(b)

It shall be unlawful for anyone to forge or alter any application, registration certificate, or dealer’s license submitted, retained or issued under this unit.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title VII, § 704, 23 DCR 2464
This section is referenced in § 7-2502.11 and § 7-2504.09.
1981 Ed., § 6-2374.
1973 Ed., § 6-1874.